Louisiana, session 2026, HB888.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:473(H), 519(A), 520(E), and (F) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 47:519(P), 520(G) through (I) and 521(D) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§473. Dealer inventory plates
* * *
H.(1) Dealers may allow authorized employees of educational institutions
or licensed sales representatives of the dealer, or both, to use, for any purpose, a
motor vehicle to which the dealer has attached a dealer inventory plate, provided the
arrangement does not constitute renting or leasing the vehicle to the employee or
sales representative. Renting or leasing does not include those transactions where
a dealer-provided automobile is treated as a taxable fringe benefit to the licensed
sales representative of the dealer under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. 61 et seq. and the
regulations issued thereunder.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 888 ENROLLED
(2) A licensed motor vehicle dealer may permit a customer of the dealer to
operate a motor vehicle to which the dealer has attached a dealer inventory plate as
a temporary courtesy loaner vehicle when the customer's motor vehicle is undergoing
repair or warranty service by the dealer.
(3) The operation of a motor vehicle in compliance with this Subsection shall
constitute a lawful use of a dealer's plate for the purposes of R.S. 47:505(D).
* * *
§519. Temporary registration plates issued by dealers
A.(1) Issuance by commissioner to dealer. The commissioner may,
Notwithstanding R.S. 47:519.1 and 519.2 or any other provision of law to the
contrary, and subject to the limitations and conditions hereinafter set forth, the
commissioner may deliver temporary registration plates designed by the
commissioner, or paper or card stock approved by the commissioner for print on
demand temporary registration plates to a licensed automobile, trailer, truck,
motorcycle, or other motor driven cycle, or motorized camper dealer who applies for
same and who enclosed with such application a fee of twenty dollars per plate or
piece of approved paper or card stock for which application is made by a licensed
dealer. Such application shall be made upon a form prescribed and furnished or on
a website approved by the commissioner. Dealers subject to the limitations and
conditions set forth in this Section may issue such temporary registration plates to
owners of vehicles, except apportioned trucks, provided that such owners shall
comply with the pertinent provisions of this Section.
(2) The application fee provided for in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall
not be charged until the commissioner provides public notice of the date that the
electronic issuance system is established for print-on-demand temporary registration
plates and the secure paper or card stock is approved and implemented by the
commissioner.
* * *
P. To ensure the security and durability of temporary registration plates,
while preventing counterfeiting, the commissioner shall do the following:
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 888 ENROLLED
(1) Approve all paper or card stock for use in print-on-demand temporary
registration plates to incorporate security features designed to prevent counterfeiting,
forgery, alteration, or duplication, including but not limited to:
(a) A machine readable, serialized identifier.
(b) At least one anti-counterfeiting visual security feature, which may
include embedded security markings such as latent images or void pantograph
technologies, holographic or tamper-evident elements, or official state-approved
insignias or seals.
(c) Durable synthetic or coated substrates meeting the standards established
by the commissioner of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of
motor vehicles, for print permanence and weather resistance.
(2) Ensure temporary registration plates shall be generated only through the
electronic issuance system approved by the commissioner of the office of motor
vehicles, and no temporary registration plate number, image, or format may be
reproduced, duplicated, altered, or generated outside of this system.
(3) Ensure that temporary registration plates, including substrate, printing
methods, inks, and materials, remain fully legible and structurally intact for the full
period of the authorized temporary registration. For purposes of this Subsection,
ordinary weather conditions shall be presumed to include outdoor exposure for a
minimum of sixty days, including exposure to rain, sunlight, heat, humidity, wind,
and normal vehicle operation. Fading, discoloration, bleeding of ink, warping,
delamination, or loss of contrast that materially impairs legibility during the
authorized registration period shall constitute noncompliance with this Section.
(4) The commissioner shall promulgate rules establishing minimum security,
material, durability, and legibility standards for the approved paper or card stock and
may replace or redesignate the approved paper or card stock if it fails to meet such
standards.
(5) Use printing methods, inks, and materials that are of sufficient quality to
ensure that required information, including the registration number, expiration date,
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 888 ENROLLED
and any machine-readable elements, does not fade or become illegible due to
ordinary weather exposure.
(6) The commissioner shall promulgate rules establishing minimum security,
material, durability, and legibility standards for approved paper or card stock and
may suspend or revoke approval of any paper or card stock that fails to meet such
standards.
§520. Dealers temporary demonstration and transportation identification plate
* * *
E. Each identification plate shall be valid for five days from the date ten
consecutive calendar days, including the date on which the identification plate was
placed in service, and shall expire at 11:59 p.m. on the tenth day.
F. Each dealership which places an identification plate in service on a motor
vehicle may use that motor vehicle for any business purpose of the dealership,
including but not limited to the demonstration or transportation of that vehicle, or
temporary customer loaner use while a customer's motor vehicle is undergoing
service or repair.
G. The identification plate may be affixed to the rear window of the vehicle.
H. For purposes of this Section, "placed in service" shall mean the first date
on which the identification plate is displayed on a motor vehicle for use.
I. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the provisions
of this Section shall govern the use of identification plates.
§521. Display of temporary license plates
* * *
D. Identification plates issued pursuant to R.S. 47:520 shall not be required
to be fastened to the rear bumper of the motor vehicle. The identification plate may
be affixed to the rear window of the vehicle.
Section 2. The commissioner shall consult with representatives of licensed motor
vehicle dealers prior to implementing the print-on-demand system and prior to making any
material change to the system, including changes to approved paper or card stock, equipment
requirements, or issuance procedures.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 888 ENROLLED
Section 3. The provisions of R.S. 47:519(P) shall become effective when the
commissioner provides public notice of the date that the electronic issuance system is
established for print-on-demand temporary registration plates and the secure paper or card
stock is approved and implemented by the commissioner.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.